ja: ペダルセットのコンポーネント: アクセル + ブレーキ; アクセル + ブレーキ + クラッチ; アクセル + ブレーキ + クラッチ + フットレスト（デッドペダル）; アクセル + ブレーキ + フットレスト（デッドペダル）; アクセルのみ; ブレーキ + クラッチ; ブレーキのみ; クラッチのみ; フットレスト（デッドペダル）のみ; その他
sv: Pedalsetets komponenter: Gas + broms; Gas + broms + koppling; Gas + broms + koppling + fotstöd; Gas + broms + fotstöd; Endast gas; Broms + koppling; Endast broms; Endast koppling; Endast fotstöd; Övrigt
pl: Elementy zestawu pedałów: Gaz i hamulec; Gaz, hamulec i sprzęgło; Gaz, hamulec, sprzęgło i podnóżek; Gaz, hamulec i podnóżek; Tylko gaz; Hamulec i sprzęgło; Tylko hamulec; Tylko sprzęgło; Tylko podnóżek; Inne
hu: Pedálkészlet elemei: Gázpedál + fék; Gázpedál + fék + kuplung; Gázpedál + fék + kuplung + lábtartó (pihentető pedál); Gázpedál + fék + lábtartó (pihentető pedál); Csak gázpedál; Fék + kuplung; Csak fék; Csak kuplung; Csak lábtartó (pihentető pedál); Egyéb
de: Pedalset-Komponenten: Gaspedal + Bremse; Gaspedal + Bremse + Kupplung; Gaspedal + Bremse + Kupplung + Fußstütze (Blindpedal); Gaspedal + Bremse + Fußstütze (Blindpedal); Nur Gaspedal; Bremse + Kupplung; Nur Bremse; Nur Kupplung; Nur Fußstütze (Blindpedal); Sonstige
pt-BR: Pedal conjunto componentes: Acelerador e freio; Acelerador, freio e embreagem; Acelerador, freio, embreagem e descanso de pé; Acelerador, freio e descanso de pé; Apenas acelerador; Freio e embreagem; Apenas freio; Apenas embreagem; Apenas descanso de pé; Outros
en: Pedal set components: Accelerator + brake; Accelerator + brake + clutch; Accelerator + brake + clutch + footrest (dead pedal); Accelerator + brake + footrest (dead pedal); Accelerator only; Brake + clutch; Brake only; Clutch only; Footrest (dead pedal) only; Other
nl: Pedaalset onderdelen: Gaspedaal + rem; Gaspedaal + rem + koppeling; Gaspedaal + rem + koppeling + voetsteun; Gaspedaal + rem + voetsteun; Alleen gaspedaal; Rem + koppeling; Alleen rem; Alleen koppeling; Alleen voetsteun (rustpedaal); Overig
sk-SK: Súčiastky v súprave pedálov: Plyn + brzda; Plyn + brzda + spojka; Plyn + brzda + spojka + opierka nohy; Plyn + brzda + opierka nohy; Iba plyn; Brzda + spojka; Iba brzda; Iba spojka; Iba opierka nohy; Iné
sl-SI: Komponente kompleta pedalov: Plin in zavora; Plin, zavora in sklopka; Plin, zavora, sklopka in naslon za nogo (mrtvi pedal); Stopalka za plin + zavora + počivalo za nogo; Samo stopalka za plin; Zavora + sklopka; Samo zavora; Samo sklopka; Samo počivalo za nogo; Drugo
nb: Pedalsettkomponenter: Gass + brems; Gass + brems + clutch; Gass + brems + clutch + fotstøtte; Gass + brems + fotstøtte; Kun gass; Brems + clutch; Kun brems; Kun clutch; Kun fotstøtte; Annet
zh-TW: 踏板組件: 油門 + 煞車; 油門 + 煞車 + 離合器; 油門 + 煞車 + 離合器 + 腳踏板 (休息踏板); 油門 + 煞車 + 腳踏板 (休息踏板); 僅油門; 煞車 + 離合器; 僅煞車; 僅離合器; 僅腳踏板 (休息踏板); 其他
ru: Компоненты набора педалей: Газ + тормоз; Газ + тормоз + сцепление; Газ + тормоз + сцепление + площадка для отдыха ноги; Газ + тормоз + площадка для отдыха ноги; Только газ; Тормоз + сцепление; Только тормоз; Только сцепление; Только площадка для отдыха ноги; Другое
zh-CN: 脚踏套装组件: 油门 + 刹车; 油门 + 刹车 + 离合器; 油门 + 刹车 + 离合器 + 搁脚板（休息踏板）; 油门 + 刹车 + 搁脚板（休息踏板）; 仅油门; 刹车 + 离合器; 仅刹车; 仅离合器; 仅搁脚板（休息踏板）; 其他
fi: Poljinsarjan osat: Kaasu + jarru; Kaasu + jarru + kytkin; Kaasu + jarru + kytkin + jalkatuki; Kaasu + jarru + jalkatuki; Vain kaasu; Jarru + kytkin; Vain jarru; Vain kytkin; Vain jalkatuki; Muu
pt-PT: Componentes do conjunto de pedais: Acelerador + travão; Acelerador + travão + embraiagem; Acelerador + travão + embraiagem + apoio de pé; Acelerador + travão + apoio de pé; Apenas acelerador; Travão + embraiagem; Apenas travão; Apenas embraiagem; Apenas apoio de pé; Outros
hr-HR: Komponente kompleta pedala: Papučica gasa + kočnica; Papučica gasa + kočnica + kvačilo; Papučica gasa + kočnica + kvačilo + oslonac za nogu; Papučica gasa + kočnica + oslonac za nogu; Samo papučica gasa; Kočnica + kvačilo; Samo kočnica; Samo kvačilo; Samo oslonac za nogu; Ostalo
el: Εξαρτήματα σετ πεντάλ: Γκάζι + φρένο; Γκάζι + φρένο + συμπλέκτης; Γκάζι + φρένο + συμπλέκτης + υποπόδιο (dead pedal); Γκάζι + φρένο + υποπόδιο (dead pedal); Μόνο γκάζι; Φρένο + συμπλέκτης; Μόνο φρένο; Μόνο συμπλέκτης; Μόνο υποπόδιο (dead pedal); Άλλο
it: Componenti del set di pedali: Acceleratore e freno; Acceleratore, freno e frizione; Acceleratore, freno, frizione e poggiapiedi; Acceleratore, freno e poggiapiedi; Solo acceleratore; Freno e frizione; Solo freno; Solo frizione; Solo poggiapiedi; Altro
da: Pedalsættets komponenter: Speeder og bremse; Speeder, bremse og kobling; Speeder, bremse, kobling og fodstøtte; Speeder, bremse og fodstøtte; Kun speeder; Bremse og kobling; Kun bremse; Kun kobling; Kun fodstøtte; Andet
cs: Komponenty sady pedálů: Plyn + brzda; Plyn + brzda + spojka; Plyn + brzda + spojka + opěrka nohy; Plyn + brzda + opěrka nohy; Pouze plyn; Brzda + spojka; Pouze brzda; Pouze spojka; Pouze opěrka nohy; Ostatní
lt-LT: Pedalų rinkinio komponentai: Akceleratorius ir stabdys; Akceleratorius, stabdys ir sankaba; Akceleratorius, stabdys, sankaba ir atrama kojai (neveikiantis pedalas); Akceleratorius, stabdys ir atrama kojai (neveikiantis pedalas); Tik akceleratorius; Stabdys ir sankaba; Tik stabdys; Tik sankaba; Tik atrama kojai (neveikiantis pedalas); Kita
ro-RO: Componentele setului de pedale: Accelerație + frână; Accelerație + frână + ambreiaj; Accelerație + frână + ambreiaj + suport pentru picior; Accelerație + frână + suport pentru picior; Doar accelerație; Frână + ambreiaj; Doar frână; Doar ambreiaj; Doar suport pentru picior; Altele
tr: Pedal seti bileşenleri: Gaz ve fren; Gaz, fren ve debriyaj; Gaz, fren, debriyaj ve ayak dayama (ölü pedal); Gaz, fren ve ayak dayama (ölü pedal); Yalnızca gaz; Fren ve debriyaj; Yalnızca fren; Yalnızca debriyaj; Yalnızca ayak dayama (ölü pedal); Diğer
th: ส่วนประกอบชุดแป้นเหยียบ: คันเร่ง + เบรก; คันเร่ง + เบรก + คลัตช์; คันเร่ง + เบรก + คลัตช์ + ที่พักเท้า; คันเร่ง + เบรก + ที่พักเท้า; คันเร่งอย่างเดียว; เบรก + คลัตช์; เบรกอย่างเดียว; คลัตช์อย่างเดียว; ที่พักเท้าอย่างเดียว; อื่นๆ
fr: Éléments du jeu de pédales: Accélérateur + frein; Accélérateur + frein + embrayage; Accélérateur + frein + embrayage + repose-pied; Accélérateur + frein + repose-pied; Accélérateur uniquement; Frein + embrayage; Frein uniquement; Embrayage uniquement; Repose-pied uniquement; Autre
vi: Các bộ phận của bộ bàn đạp: Chân ga + phanh; Chân ga + phanh + ly hợp; Chân ga + phanh + ly hợp + chỗ để chân; Chân ga + phanh + chỗ để chân; Chỉ chân ga; Phanh + ly hợp; Chỉ phanh; Chỉ ly hợp; Chỉ chỗ để chân; Khác
es: Componentes del juego de pedales: Acelerador y freno; Acelerador, freno y embrague; Acelerador, freno, embrague y reposapiés; Acelerador, freno y reposapiés; Solo acelerador; Freno y embrague; Solo freno; Solo embrague; Solo reposapiés; Otro
ko: 페달 세트 구성품: 가속 페달 + 브레이크; 가속 페달 + 브레이크 + 클러치; 가속 페달 + 브레이크 + 클러치 + 풋레스트(데드 페달); 가속 페달 + 브레이크 + 풋레스트(데드 페달); 가속 페달만; 브레이크 + 클러치; 브레이크만; 클러치만; 풋레스트(데드 페달)만; 기타
bg-BG: Компоненти на комплекта педали: Газ + спирачка; Газ + спирачка + съединител; Газ + спирачка + съединител + поставка за крак (мъртъв педал); Газ + спирачка + поставка за крак (мъртъв педал); Само газ; Спирачка + съединител; Само спирачка; Само съединител; Само поставка за крак (мъртъв педал); Други